Utah statutes.
10-8-44.   Food stuffs -- Regulation and inspection.

They may provide for and regulate the inspection of meats, fruit, poultry, fish, butter, cheese, lard, vegetables, flour, meal and all other provisions, and provide for the inspection, measurement or graduation of any merchandise, manufacture or commodity, and appoint the necessary officers therefor.

